Wisconsin, session 2025, SB269.
do enact as follows:SB269,11Section 1. 39.396 of the statutes is created to read:SB269,2,2239.396 School psychologist loan program. (1) In this section:SB269,2,33(a) “Rural county” means a county that satisfies all of the following:SB269,2,441. The county does not include any urbanized area.SB269,2,652. Less than 25 percent of individuals residing in the county are employed in 6another county that includes an urbanized area.SB269,2,873. Less than 25 percent of individuals employed in the county reside in 8another county that includes an urbanized area.SB269,2,129(b) “School psychologist” means a psychologist licensed under s. 455.04 (1) or 10(2) who practices in a school-based setting or an individual who is licensed as a 11school psychologist under rules promulgated by the department of public 12instruction.SB269,2,1313(c) “Urbanized area” has the meaning given in 23 USC 134 (b) (7).SB269,2,1514(2) The board shall establish a school psychologist loan program for students 15who meet all of the following requirements:SB269,2,1816(a) Are residents of this state enrolled at least half-time as graduate students 17in an institution of higher education, as defined in 20 USC 1001 (a) and (b), located 18in this state.SB269,2,1919(b) Are enrolled in programs of study leading to a school psychologist career.SB269,2,2120(c) Have a grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4-point scale or the 21equivalent.SB269,3,222(3) A student eligible for a loan under sub. (2) may be awarded loans of up to 1$10,000 annually for not more than 3 years, with a maximum of $30,000 in loans to 2a student under this section.SB269,3,43(4) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), loans under sub. (2) shall be repaid at an 4annual interest rate of 5 percent.SB269,3,85(b) The board shall forgive 25 percent of the loan and 25 percent of the interest 6on the loan for each school year the recipient is employed as a full-time school 7psychologist by a public or private elementary or secondary school in an urbanized 8area or in a school district in a rural county.SB269,3,109(5) The board shall deposit in the general fund as general purpose revenue — 10earned all repayments of loans made under sub. (2) and the interest on the loans.SB269,211Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB269,3,1512(1) Higher educational aids board 2027-29 biennial budget request. In 13submitting information under s. 16.42 (1) for the purposes of the 2027-29 biennial 14budget bill, the higher educational aids board shall include a request for funding for 15the school psychologist loan program under s. 39.396.SB269,3,1616